Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE C. STATE MILITARY FORCES AND VETERANS

CHAPTER 431. STATE MILITIA

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 431.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Reserve militia" means the persons liable to serve, but not serving, in the state military forces.

(1-a) "Servicemember" has the meaning assigned by Section 161.551, Health and Safety Code.

(2) "State militia" means the state military forces and the reserve militia.

(3) "State military forces" means the Texas National Guard, the Texas State Guard, and any other active militia or military force organized under state law.

(4) "Texas National Guard" means the Texas Army National Guard and the Texas Air National Guard.

(5) "Employee" has the meaning assigned by Section 21.002, Labor Code.

(6) "Employer" has the meaning assigned by Section 21.002, Labor Code.

(7) "Political subdivision" has the meaning assigned by Section 21.002, Labor Code.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1058), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1281 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADJUTANT GENERAL'S DEPARTMENT

Sec. 431.030. REPORT OF MILITARY USE OF PROPERTY. (a) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (S.B. 1536), Sec. 4.01(2), eff. September 1, 2013.

Without reference to the amendment of this subsection, this subchapter was repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (S.B. 1536), Sec. 4.01(2), eff. September 1, 2013.

(b) Not later than August 1 of the year in which the Commissioner of the General Land Office submits a report as provided by Section 31.157, Natural Resources Code, the adjutant general shall submit a preliminary report of the report required under Subsection (a) to the Commissioner of the General Land Office identifying the real property used for military purposes. Not later than September 1 of the year in which the Commissioner of the General Land Office submits a report as provided by Section 31.157, Natural Resources Code, the adjutant general shall submit the report as required by Subsection (a) to:

(1) the governor;

(2) the presiding officer of each house of the legislature; and

(3) the Governor's Office of Budget, Planning, and Policy.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 907, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1021, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1168, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1335 (S.B. 1724), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (S.B. 1536), Sec. 4.01(2), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 59), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 431.034. REPORT.

Without reference to the amendment of this subsection, this subchapter was repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (S.B. 1536), Sec. 4.01(2), eff. September 1, 2013.

(a) The adjutant general annually shall report to the governor. The report shall be delivered to the legislature. The report must include:

(1) an account, to the extent of the adjutant general's knowledge, of all arms, ammunition, and other military property owned by or in possession of the state, the source from which it was received, to whom it is issued, and its present condition;

(2) a statement of the number, condition, and organization of the Texas National Guard and reserve militia;

(3) suggestions that the adjutant general considers important to the military interests and conditions of the state and the perfection of its military organization;

(4) a list and description of all Texas National Guard missions that are in progress at the time the report is prepared; and

(5) a statement of department plans to obtain and maintain future Texas National Guard missions, including proposed missions that are consistent with the United States Department of Defense's war-fighting strategies, including strategies used in the war on terrorism.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (S.B. 1536), Sec. 4.01(2), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1021, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 31, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (S.B. 1536), Sec. 4.01(2), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 59), Sec. 32, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER E. RESERVE MILITIA

Sec. 431.071. MILITARY DUTY. (a) The reserve militia is not subject to active military duty, except that the governor may call into service the portion of the reserve militia needed for the period required in case of war, insurrection, invasion or prevention of invasion, suppression of riot, tumult, or breach of peace or to aid civil officers to execute law or serve process.

(b) The governor may assign members of the reserve militia who are called into service to existing organizations of the state military forces or organize them as circumstances require.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 431.072. COUNTY EMERGENCY BOARD. The county emergency board of each county consists of the county judge, sheriff, and tax assessor-collector. If one of those officers is unable to act, the governor shall designate another public official to serve on the board.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 431.073. DRAFT. (a) The governor, by order to the county emergency board, shall apportion the number of members of the reserve militia called into service among the counties by draft according to each county's population or by other means the governor directs. The county emergency board shall establish fair and equitable procedures for selection of persons to fill the draft according to regulations adopted by the governor. On completion of the selection, the board shall deliver a list of the persons selected to the governor and notify each person selected of the time and place to appear and report.

(b) A member of the reserve militia while in active service is a member of the state military forces under Section 432.001(16), and is subject to the punitive provisions of Chapter 432. A member who does not appear at the time and place designated by the county emergency board shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 431.074. PENALTY. (a) A member of a county emergency board who neglects or refuses to perform a duty required by this subchapter commits an offense.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000 and confinement in jail for not less than six nor more than 12 months.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER H. CALLING OF FORCES

Sec. 431.111. CALLING OF FORCES BY GOVERNOR. (a) The governor may call all or part of the state military forces to repel or suppress an invasion of or insurrection in or threatened invasion of or insurrection in the state or if the governor considers it necessary to enforce state law. If the number of state military forces is insufficient, the governor shall call the part of the reserve militia that the governor considers necessary.

(b) The governor may call all or part of the state military forces to assist civil authorities in guarding prisoners, conveying prisoners within the state, or executing law as the public interest or safety requires.

(c) The governor may order a commander of a unit of the state military forces to appear at a time and place directed to suppress or prevent tumult, riot, or the actions of a group of persons acting together by force with intent to commit a breach of the peace or violence to a person or property or to otherwise violate state law.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 431.112. CALLING OF FORCES BY OTHER OFFICIAL. If military aid is immediately and urgently necessary to prevent or suppress violence under Section 431.111(c) and it is impracticable to secure the aid in time by order of the governor, the district judge of the judicial district, the sheriff of the county, or the mayor of the municipality in which the disturbance occurs may call for aid on the commanding officer of the state military forces stationed in the judicial district, county, or municipality or an adjacent judicial district, county, or municipality. The officer must make the call in writing and shall immediately notify the governor of the action.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 431.113. DUTY OF COMMANDING OFFICER. (a) On receipt of a call under this subchapter, a commanding officer immediately shall order the called forces under the officer's command to parade at the time and place appointed and shall notify the governor of the action.

(b) After the forces have appeared at the appointed place, the commanding officer shall obey and execute the general instructions of the civil authorities charged by law with the suppression of riot or tumult or the preservation of public peace. The instructions must be in writing, except that if written instructions are impracticable the instructions must be given verbally in the presence of two or more credible witnesses. The commanding officer is solely responsible for determining the kind and extent of force to be used and the method of implementing the instructions.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 431.114. SALE OF ARMS. The commanding officer of forces called to enforce law may order the closing of any place where arms, ammunition, or explosives are sold and forbid the sale, barter, loan, or gift of arms, ammunition, or explosives while forces are on duty in or near that place.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 431.115. STATE OF INSURRECTION. The governor by proclamation may declare any portion of the state where state military forces are serving in aid of the civil authority to be in a state of insurrection, if the governor determines that law and order will be promoted by the declaration.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER J. AWARDS